Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 50. Notaries Public.
Sec. 44.50.200.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“acknowledgment” means a declaration by an individual before a notarial officer that the individual has signed a record for the purpose stated in the record and, if the record is signed in a representative capacity, that the individual signed the record with proper authority and signed it as the act of the individual or entity identified in the record;

“communication technology” means an electronic device or process that

allows a notary public and a remotely located individual to communicate with each other simultaneously by sight and sound; and

when necessary and consistent with other applicable law, facilitates communication with a remotely located individual who has a visual, hearing, or speech impairment;

“convicted” or “conviction” means that the person has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill by a court or jury;

“electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by an individual with the intent to sign the record;

“identity proofing” means a process or service by which a third person provides a notary public with a means to verify the identity of a remotely located individual by a review of personal information from public or private data sources;

“in a representative capacity” means acting as

an authorized officer, agent, partner, trustee, or other representative for a person other than an individual;

a public officer, personal representative, guardian, or other representative in the capacity stated in a record;

an agent or attorney-in-fact for a principal; or

an authorized representative of another in any other capacity;

“notarial act” means an act, whether performed with respect to a tangible or electronic record, that is identified as a notarial act under AS

09.63.120

and an act that a notary public is directed to perform under AS

44.50.060

;

“notarial officer” means a notary public or other individual authorized to perform a notarial act;

“notary public” means a person commissioned to perform notarial acts under this chapter;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“remotely located individual” means an individual who is not in the physical presence of a notary public who performs a notarial act under AS

44.50.075

;

“sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to

execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“signature” means a tangible symbol or an electronic signature that evidences the signing of a record.

History.

(§ 13 ch 60 SLA 2005; am §§ 15, 16 ch 24 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, the paragraphs in this section were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, in (2) [now (8)], added “, whether performed with respect to a tangible or electronic record,”; added
(4) [now (1)], (5) [now (2)], (6) [now (4)], (7) [now (5)], (8) [now (6)], (9) [now (7)], (10) [now (9)], (11) - (14), renumbering the existing paragraphs accordingly to maintain alphabetical order.